Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.105

Trustees—Organization and officers of board—Quorum.

The board of The Evergreen State College trustees shall elect one of its members chair, and it shall elect a secretary, who may or may not be a member of the board. The board shall have power to adopt bylaws for its government and for the government of the school, which bylaws shall not be inconsistent with law, and to prescribe the duties of its officers, committees, and employees. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business.

[ 2011 c 336 s 732; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 66; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.105. Prior: 1909 p 252 s 3; RRS s 4606; prior: 1897 c 118 s 214; 1893 c 107 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.81.030 and 28.81.050(1), (2).]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.